Utah statutes.
61-2c-401.   Investigations.
(1)  The division may investigate or cause to be investigated the actions of:
(a) (i)  a licensee;
(ii)  a person required to be licensed under this chapter; or
(iii)  the following with respect to an entity that is a licensee or an entity
required to be licensed under this chapter:
(A)  a manager;
(B)  a managing partner;
(C)  a director;
(D)  an executive officer; or
(E)  an individual who performs a function similar to an individual listed in
this Subsection (1)(a)(iii);
(b) (i)  an applicant for licensure or renewal of licensure under this
chapter; or
(ii)  the following with respect to an entity that has applied for a license
or renewal of licensure under this chapter:
(A)  a manager;
(B)  a managing partner;
(C)  a director;
(D)  an executive officer; or
(E)  an individual who performs a function similar to an individual listed in
this Subsection (1)(b)(ii); or
(c) a person who transacts the business of residential mortgage loans within
this state.
(2)  In conducting investigations, records inspections, and adjudicative
proceedings, the division may:
(a)  administer an oath or affirmation;
(b)  subpoena witnesses and evidence;
(c)  take evidence;
(d)  require the production of a record or information relevant to an
investigation; and
(e)  serve a subpoena by certified mail.
(3)  A failure to respond to a request by the division in an investigation
authorized under this chapter is considered as a separate violation of this
chapter, including:
(a)  failing to respond to a subpoena;
(b)  withholding evidence; or
(c)  failing to produce a record.
(4)  The division may inspect and copy a record related to the business of
residential mortgage loans by a licensee under this chapter, regardless of
whether the record is maintained at a business location in Utah, in
conducting:
(a)  investigations of complaints; or
(b)  inspections of the record required to be maintained under:
(i)  this chapter; or
(ii)  rules adopted by the division under this chapter.
(5) (a)  If a licensee maintains a record required by this chapter and the
rules adopted by the division under this chapter outside Utah, the licensee is
responsible for all reasonable costs, including reasonable travel costs,
incurred by the division in inspecting the record.
(b)  Upon receipt of notification from the division that a record maintained
outside Utah is to be examined in connection with an investigation or an
examination, the licensee shall deposit with the division a deposit of $500 to
cover the division's expenses in connection with the examination of the
record.
(c)  If the deposit described in Subsection (5)(b) is insufficient to meet the
estimated costs and expenses of examination of the record, the licensee shall
make an additional deposit to cover the estimated costs and expenses of the
division.
(d) (i) A deposit under this Subsection (5) shall be deposited in the General
Fund as a dedicated credit to be used by the division under Subsection (5)(a).
(ii)  The division, with the concurrence of the executive director, may use a
deposit as a dedicated credit for the records inspection costs under
Subsection (5)(a).
(iii)  A deposit under this Subsection (5) shall be refunded to the licensee
to the extent it is not used, together with an itemized statement from the
division of all amounts it has used.
(6)  Failure to deposit with the division a deposit required to cover the
costs of examination of a record that is maintained outside Utah shall result
in automatic suspension of a license until the deposit is made.
(7) (a)  If a person is found to have violated this chapter or a rule made
under this chapter, the person shall pay the costs incurred by the division to
copy a record required under this chapter, including the costs incurred to
copy an electronic record in a universally readable format.
(b)  If a person fails to pay the costs described in Subsection (7)(a) when
due, the person's license or certification is automatically suspended:
(i)  beginning the day on which the payment of costs is due; and
(ii)  ending the day on which the costs are paid.
